Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB799.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725-A(a)(2) and (3) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1725-A. Funding for Charter Schools.--(a) Funding for a charter school shall be provided in the following manner:* * *(2) For non-special education students and in accordance with clause (2.1) if applicable, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled no less than the budgeted total expenditure per average daily membership of the prior school year, as defined in section 2501(20), minus the budgeted 1234567891011121314151617181920 expenditures of the district of residence for nonpublic school programs; adult education programs; community/junior college programs; student transportation services; for special education programs; facilities acquisition, construction and improvement services; and other financing uses, including debt service and fund transfers as provided in the Manual of Accounting and Related Financial Procedures for Pennsylvania School Systems established by the department. This amount shall be paid by the district of residence of each student.(2.1) In addition to clause (2), if the school district or intermediate unit of a student offers a cyber charter school and the student enrolls in a cyber charter school not affiliated with the school district or intermediate unit, the expenditure to the nonaffiliated cyber charter school for the student under clause (2) shall be limited to the highest amount a cyber charter school affiliated with the school district or intermediate unit, if any, would have received for the student.(3) For special education students, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the same funding as for each non-special education student as provided in clause (2) and, if applicable, clause (2.1), plus an additional amount determined by dividing the district of residence's total special education expenditure by the product of multiplying the combined percentage of section 2509.5(k) times the district of residence's total average daily membership for the prior school year. This amount shall be paid by the district of residence of each student.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0799PN0848 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829